src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Livonian Verb inflection
This file documents the verb inflection of Livonian.

## Verb stem classes
**LEXICON V_ = CONJUGATION TYPE MISSING

**LEXICON TV_ = CONJUGATION TYPE MISSING

**LEXICON V-AUX_VȰLDA =  10 vȱlda:ZERO

**LEXICON IV_VȰLDA = 10 vȱlda: goes to **K**

**LEXICON V-AUX_LǞʼDÕ = 1 lǟʼdõ:lǟʼ

**LEXICON IV_LǞʼDÕ = 1 lǟʼdõ:lǟʼ

**LEXICON TV_TǬʼDÕ = 2 tǭʼdõ:tǭʼ

**LEXICON V-AUX_VĪDÕ = 3 vīdõ:vī

**LEXICON IV_VĪDÕ = 3 vīdõ:vī

**LEXICON TV_VĪDÕ = 3 vīdõ:vī

**LEXICON TV_NǞʼDÕ = 4 nǟʼdõ:nǟʼ
* Yaml: **naeaeqdw**

**LEXICON IV_KǞʼDÕ = 5 kǟʼdõ:kǟʼ

**LEXICON TV_TĪʼEDÕ = 6 tīʼedõ:tīʼe

**LEXICON V-AUX_SĪEDÕ = 7 sīedõ:sīe

**LEXICON IV_SĪEDÕ = 7 sīedõ:sīe

**LEXICON TV_SĪEDÕ = 7 sīedõ:sīe

**LEXICON IV_SǬDÕ = 8 sǭdõ:s

**LEXICON TV_SǬDÕ = 8 sǭdõ:s

**LEXICON V-AUX_SǬDÕ = 8 sǭdõ:s

**LEXICON TV_JŪODÕ = 9 jūodõ:jūo

**LEXICON IV_TŪLDA = 11 tūlda:tūʼl

**LEXICON V-AUX_PĀNDA = 12 pānda:pāʼn

**LEXICON IV_PĀNDA = 12 pānda:pāʼn

**LEXICON TV_PĀNDA = 12 pānda:pāʼn

**LEXICON IV_JEʼLLÕ = 13 jeʼllõ:jeʼlā

**LEXICON TV_JEʼLLÕ =  13 jeʼllõ:jeʼllõ

**LEXICON IV_ASTÕ = 18 astõ:astõ

**LEXICON TV_ASTÕ =  18 astõ:astõ

**LEXICON TV_VÕTTÕ = 19 võttõ:võttõ

**LEXICON IV_VIEʼDDÕ = 24 vieʼddõ:vieʼddõ

**LEXICON TV_VIEʼDDÕ = 24 vieʼddõ:vieʼddõ

**LEXICON IV_MAKSÕ = 25 maksõ:maksõ

**LEXICON TV_MAKSÕ = 25 maksõ:maksõ

**LEXICON TV_TAPPÕ = 26 tappõ:tappõ

**LEXICON IV_MÄNGÕ = 14 mängõ:mǟnga

**LEXICON TV_KILLÕ = 15 killõ:kīla

**LEXICON TV_PALLÕ = 16 pallõ:pǭla

**LEXICON TV_LOULÕ = 17 loulõ:lōla

**LEXICON IV_LAITÕ = 20 laittõ:lāita

**LEXICON TV_LAITÕ = 20 laittõ:lāita

**LEXICON IV_TÄUTÕ = 21 täutõ:tǟta

**LEXICON TV_TÄUTÕ = 21 täutõ:tǟuta

**LEXICON TV_PȮĻTÕ = 22 pȯļtõ:pūoļta

**LEXICON TV_MȮISTÕ = 23 mȯistõ:mūošta

**LEXICON IV_ANDÕ = 27 andõ:ānda

**LEXICON TV_ANDÕ = 27 andõ:ānda

**LEXICON IV_TIEUDÕ = 28 tieudõ:tīeda

**LEXICON TV_TIEUDÕ = 28 tieudõ:tīeda

29-48 follow same pattern

**LEXICON IV_LUʼGGÕ = luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29

**LEXICON TV_LUʼGGÕ = luʼggõ:lugū 29

**LEXICON IV_MUʼDŽÕ = muʼdžõ:mudžū 30

**LEXICON TV_MUʼDŽÕ = muʼdžõ:mudžū 30

**LEXICON IV_VAKȚÕ = vakțõ:vakțū 31

**LEXICON TV_VAKȚÕ =  vakțõ:vakțū 31

**LEXICON IV_KITTÕ = kittõ:kittõ 32

**LEXICON TV_KITTÕ = kittõ:kittõ 32

**LEXICON V-AUX_RIʼDDÕ = riʼddõ:ridū 33

**LEXICON IV_RIʼDDÕ = riʼddõ:ridū 33

**LEXICON TV_RIʼDDÕ = riʼddõ:ridū 33

**LEXICON IV_KUTSÕ = kutsõ:kutsū 34

**LEXICON TV_KUTSÕ = kutsõ:kutsū 34

**LEXICON V-AUX_LASKÕ = laskõ:laskū 35

**LEXICON IV_LASKÕ = laskõ:laskū 35

**LEXICON TV_LASKÕ = laskõ:laskū 35

**LEXICON TV_KÄSKÕ = laskõ:laskū 35b

**LEXICON IV_AKKÕ = akkõ:akū 36
Should ss be s and šš be š? 2013-02-19

**LEXICON TV_AKKÕ = akkõ:akū 36

**LEXICON V-AUX_AIGÕ = aigõ:āigõ 37

**LEXICON IV_AIGÕ = aigõ:āigõ 37

**LEXICON TV_AIGÕ = aigõ:āigõ 37

**LEXICON TV_KUOŖŖÕ = kuoŗŗõ:kūoŗõ 38

**LEXICON TV_VANNÕ = vannõ:vǭnõ 39

**LEXICON IV_PȮĻĻÕ = pȯļļõ:pūoļõ 40

**LEXICON IV_PȮIMÕ = pȯimõ:pūoimõ 41

**LEXICON TV_PȮIMÕ = pȯimõ:pūoimõ 41

**LEXICON IV_OUŖÕ = ouŗõ:ōŗõ 42

**LEXICON IV_KEIJÕ = keijõ:kējõ 43

**LEXICON TV_KEIJÕ = keijõ:kējõ 43

**LEXICON IV_AŖŠTÕ = aŗštõ:āŗštõ 44

**LEXICON TV_AŖŠTÕ = aŗštõ:āŗštõ 44

**LEXICON TV_PȮRTÕ = pȯrtõ:pūortõ 45

**LEXICON TV_OUTÕ = outõ:ōtõ 46

**LEXICON V-AUX_TUNDÕ = tundõ:tūndõ 47

**LEXICON IV_TUNDÕ = tundõ:tūndõ 47

**LEXICON TV_TUNDÕ = tundõ:tūndõ 47

**LEXICON TV_OUDÕ = oudõ:ōdõ 48

**LEXICON IV_KŪLÕ = kūlõ:kūlõ 49

**LEXICON TV_KŪLÕ = kūlõ:kūlõ 49

**LEXICON IV_ARRÕ = arrõ:arrõ 50

**LEXICON TV_ARRÕ = arrõ:arrõ 50

**LEXICON IV_AʼILÕ = aʼilõ:aʼilõ 51

**LEXICON TV_AʼILÕ = aʼilõ:aʼilõ 51

**LEXICON TV_SVAʼRRÕ = svaʼrrõ:svaʼrrõ 52

**LEXICON V-AUX_KĪTÕ = kītõ:kīt 53

**LEXICON IV_KĪTÕ = kītõ:kīt 53
~701

**LEXICON TV_KĪTÕ = kītõ:kīt 53

**LEXICON IV_ÄʼBȚÕ = äʼbțõ:äʼbț 54

**LEXICON TV_ÄʼBȚÕ = äʼbțõ:äʼbț 54

**LEXICON V-AUX_KŪLDÕ = kūldõ:kūld 55

**LEXICON IV_KŪLDÕ = kūldõ:kūld 55

**LEXICON TV_KŪLDÕ = kūldõ:kūld 55

**LEXICON TV_KĪSKÕ = kīskõ:kīsk 56

**LEXICON V-AUX_ĪʼEDÕ = īʼedõ:īed 57

**LEXICON IV_ĪʼEDÕ = īʼedõ:īed 57

**LEXICON TV_ĪʼEDÕ = īʼedõ:īed 57

**LEXICON IV_UMBLÕ = umblõ: 58

**LEXICON TV_UMBLÕ = umblõ: 58

**LEXICON IV_ERȚĻÕ = erțļõ:erțõlõ 58b

**LEXICON TV_ERȚĻÕ = erțļõ:erțõlõ 58b

**LEXICON V-AUX_MÕTLÕ = mõtlõ: 59

**LEXICON IV_MÕTLÕ = mõtlõ: 59

**LEXICON TV_MÕTLÕ = mõtlõ: 59

**LEXICON IV_MǞʼDLÕ = mǟʼdlõ: 60

**LEXICON TV_MǞʼDLÕ = mǟʼdlõ: 60

**LEXICON IV_NAʼGRÕ = naʼgrõ: 60

**LEXICON TV_NAʼGRÕ = naʼgrõ: 60

**LEXICON V-AUX_ÄʼB = 62 äʼb:ä

**LEXICON TV_SÄ = 63 sä:sä

**LEXICON V-AUX_PIḐĪKS = 64 piḑīks:piḑī

## After transitive, intransitive, auxiliary and such tags have been added
1

2
tǭʼdõ:tǭʼ

Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

3
**LEXICON V-01_VĪDÕ = This is mutual for 3: 
vīdõ:vī
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

**LEXICON V-01_NǞʼDÕ = This is mutual for ??: 
4 nǟʼdõ:n
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

**LEXICON V-01_KǞʼDÕ = This is mutual for ??: 
4 kǟʼdõ:kǟʼ
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

**LEXICON V-01_TĪʼEDÕ = : 6 tīedõ:tīʼe
* Yaml: **siiedw**
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo
participles

**LEXICON V-01_SĪEDÕ = : 7 sīedõ:sīe
* Yaml: **siiedw**
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

8
sǭdõ:s
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles
9
9
jūodõ:jūo
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles
10

11
tūlda:tūʼl
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo
participles
11

12
12
pānda:pāʼn
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo
participles

**LEXICON V-01_JEʼLLÕ = 13 jeʼllõ, 18 astõ, 19 võttõ, 24 vieʼddõ, 25 maksõ, 26 tappõ

Cond
Imprt
Jus
Qvo

participles

14
mängõ:mǟngõ
**LEXICON V-01_MÄNGÕ = 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ, 20 laitõ, 21 täutõ, 22 pȯļtõ, 23 mȯistõ, 27 āndõ, 28 tīeudõ

Imprt
Jus
Qvo

participles

15
killõ:kīllõ
**LEXICON V-01_KILLÕ = 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ, 20 laitõ, 21 täutõ, 22 pȯļtõ, 23 mȯistõ, 27 āndõ, 28 tīeudõ

Imprt
Jus
Qvo

participles

16
pallõ:pǭllõ
**LEXICON V-01_PALLÕ = 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ, 20 laitõ, 21 täutõ, 22 pȯļtõ, 23 mȯistõ, 27 āndõ, 28 tīeudõ

Imprt
Jus
Qvo

participles

17 loulõ:lōulõ
**LEXICON V-01_LOULÕ = 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ

18 astõ:astõ
**LEXICON V-01_ASTÕ = 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ

19 võttõ:võttõ
**LEXICON V-01_VÕTTÕ = 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ

20 laitõ:
**LEXICON V-01_LAITÕ = 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ, 20 laitõ

**LEXICON V-01_TÄUTÕ = 21 täutõ:tǟutõ

22 pȯļțõ:p
**LEXICON V-01_PȮĻTÕ = 22 pȯļtõ, 23 mȯistõ, 27 āndõ, 28 tīeudõ
Cond
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

23 mȯistõ:m
**LEXICON V-01_MȮISTÕ = 23 mȯistõ, 27 āndõ, 28 tīeudõ

Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

**LEXICON V-01_VIEʼDDÕ = 13 jeʼllõ, 18 astõ, 19 võttõ, 24 vieʼddõ, 25 maksõ, 26 tappõ

Cond
Imprt
Jus
Qvo

participles

**LEXICON V-01_MAKSÕ = 13 jeʼllõ, 18 astõ, 19 võttõ, 24 vieʼddõ, 25 maksõ, 26 tappõ

Cond
Imprt
Jus
Qvo

participles

**LEXICON V-01_TAPPÕ = 13 jeʼllõ, 18 astõ, 19 võttõ, 24 vieʼddõ, 25 maksõ, 26 tappõ

Cond
Imprt
Jus
Qvo

participles

27
andõ:āndõ
**LEXICON V-01_ANDÕ = 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ, 20 laitõ, 21 täutõ, 22 pȯļtõ, 23 mȯistõ, 27 āndõ, 28 tīeudõ

Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

28
tieudõ:tīeudõ
**LEXICON V-01_TIEUDÕ = 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ, 20 laitõ, 21 täutõ, 22 pȯļtõ, 23 mȯistõ, 27 āndõ, 28 tīeudõ

Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

29
LEXICON	V-01_LUʼGGÕ  luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29
This is mutual for 29-36: 
luʼggõ, muʼdžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riʼddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ
Prt
ImprtI

Jus
Kvo

participles

30
LEXICON	V-01_MUʼDŽÕ  luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29
This is mutual for 29-36: 
luʼggõ, muʼdžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riʼddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ
Prt
ImprtI

Jus
Kvo

participles

31
LEXICON	V-01_VAKȚÕ  luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29
This is mutual for 29-36: 
luʼggõ, muʼdžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riʼddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ
Prt
ImprtI

Jus
Kvo

participles

32
LEXICON	V-01_KITTÕ  kittõ:kittõ 32
This is mutual for 29-36: 
luʼggõ, muʼdžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riʼddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ

Prt
ImprtI

Jus
Kvo

participles

33
LEXICON	V-01_RIʼDDÕ  riʼddõ:riʼddõ 33
This is mutual for 29-36: 
luʼggõ, muʼdžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riʼddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ
Prt
ImprtI

Jus
Kvo

participles

34
LEXICON	V-01_KUTSÕ  luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29
This is mutual for 29-36: 
luʼggõ, muʼdžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riʼddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ
Prt
ImprtI

Jus
Kvo

participles

35
LEXICON	V-01_LASKÕ  luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29
This is mutual for 29-36: 
luʼggõ, muʼdžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riʼddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ
Prt
ImprtI

Jus
Kvo

participles

35b
LEXICON	V-01_KÄSKÕ  luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29
This is mutual for 29-36: 
luʼggõ, muʼdžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riʼddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ
Prt
ImprtI

Jus
Kvo

participles

36
LEXICON	V-01_AKKÕ  luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29
This is mutual for 29-36: 
luʼggõ, muʼdžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riʼddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ
Prt
ImprtI

Jus
Kvo

participles

37
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_KUOŖŖÕ = kuoŗŗõ:kūoŗŗõ 38
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_VANNÕ = vannõ:vǭnnõ 39
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_PȮĻĻÕ = pȯļļõ:pūoļļõ 40
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_PȮIMÕ = pȯimõ:pūoimõ 41
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_OUŖÕ = ouŗõ:ōuŗõ 42
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_KEIJÕ = keijõ:kēijõ 43
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_AŖŠTÕ = aŗštõ:āŗštõ 44
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_PȮRTÕ = pȯrtõ:pūortõ 45
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_OUTÕ = outõ:ōutõ 46
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_TUNDÕ = tundõ:tūndõ 47
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

**LEXICON V-01_OUDÕ = oudõ:ōdõ 48
This is mutual for 37-48

Prt

participles

49
**LEXICON V-01_KŪLÕ =  This is mutual for 49-50, 52-57
Prt
+Act+PrfPrc
Cond

50
arrõ:arrõ
**LEXICON V-01_ARRÕ =  This is mutual for 49-50, 52-57
Prt
+Act+PrfPrc
Cond

51
**LEXICON V-01_AʼILÕ =  This is mutual for 51
Ger, Ger_Ine

* **INF_ZERO ;** aʼilõ
Inf

* **SUP-STEM_m ;** aʼilõ-
Sup, Sup+Abe, Sup+Ela, Sup+Deb, Sup+Ill, Sup+Ine, Sup+Tra
Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Ind+Prs+Pl3, Ind+ConNeg+Pl1
Ind+ConNeg+Pl2, Ind+ConNeg+Pl3

* **: INDPRSSG1-STEM ;** aʼilõ-
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Ind+Prs+Sg3

* **:%^VowsRM INDCONNEGSG ;** aʼil-
Ind+ConNeg+Sg

* **:%^VowsRM%>i INDPRT_z ;** aʼili-
Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Ind+Prt+Pl3

* **COND ;** aʼilõ-
Cond...
Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2

Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2, Imprt+ConNeg

Jus+Sg3, Jus+Pl3

Quo+Sg3, Quo+Pl3, +NomAct -mi

* **ACTPRFPRC_n ;** aʼilõ%>n
+Act+PrfPrc

* **:%^VowsRM PSSPRSPRC ;** aʼil-
* **:%^VowsRM PSSPRFPRCSG ;** aʼil-

52
**LEXICON V-01_SVAʼRRÕ =  This is mutual for 49-50, 52-57
Prt
+Act+PrfPrc
Cond

**LEXICON V-01_KĪTÕ =  This is mutual for 49-50, 52-57
Prt
+Act+PrfPrc
Cond

**LEXICON V-01_ÄʼBȚÕ =  This is mutual for 49-50, 52-57

Prt
+Act+PrfPrc
Cond

55
**LEXICON V-01_KŪLDÕ =  This is mutual for 49-50, 52-57
Prt
+Act+PrfPrc
Cond

56
**LEXICON V-01_KĪSKÕ =  This is mutual for 49-50, 52-57
Prt
+Act+PrfPrc
Cond

57
īedõ:īʼedõ
**LEXICON V-01_ĪʼEDÕ =  This is mutual for 49-50, 52-57
Prt
+Act+PrfPrc
Cond

58
umblõ:umbõlõ
**LEXICON V-01_UMBLÕ = This is mutual for 58-61: 
umblõ, mõtlõ, mǟʼdlõ, naʼgrõ
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

58
erțļõ:erțõlõ
**LEXICON V-01_ERȚĻÕ = This is mutual for 58-61: 
umblõ, mõtlõ, mǟʼdlõ, naʼgrõ
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

59
mõtlõ:umbõlõ
**LEXICON V-01_MÕTLÕ = This is mutual for 58-61: 
umblõ, mõtlõ, mǟʼdlõ, naʼgrõ
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

60
mǟʼdlõ:mǟʼdõlõ
**LEXICON V-01_MǞʼDLÕ = This is mutual for 58-61: 
umblõ, mõtlõ, mǟʼdlõ, naʼgrõ
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

61
naʼgrõ:naʼgõrõ
**LEXICON V-01_NAʼGRÕ = This is mutual for 58-61: 
umblõ, mõtlõ, mǟʼdlõ, naʼgrõ
Prt
Imprt

Jus
Qvo

participles

### Nonfinites

**LEXICON GER_s = 

**LEXICON GER_sõ = 

**LEXICON INF_ZERO = 

**LEXICON INF_dõ = 

**LEXICON INF_da = 

**LEXICON SUP-STEM_m = 

**LEXICON SUP_m = 

**LEXICON SUP_m = 

**LEXICON SUP_mõ = 

**LEXICON ACTPRSPRC = 

**LEXICON ACTPRSPRC = 

**LEXICON ACTPRFPRC_nd = 
Are the singular and plural homonyms?

**LEXICON ACTPRFPRC_SG-d/PL-nõd = 
